Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-237
Information; copies; with whom filed.

A copy of all information filed with the department pursuant to section 9-232.01 shall also be filed with the county clerk of the county in which the bingo is to be conducted, and if the bingo is conducted within the limits of an incorporated city or village, a copy shall also be filed with the city or village clerk. Such information shall be filed within five days after its filing with the department.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 41;

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 28;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 38;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-164;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 38;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 37.